Utah statutes.
72-10-302.   Purpose and policy of part.
It is declared that the purpose of this part is to further the public interest
in aeronautical progress:
(1)  by authorizing public agencies of this state to accept, channel, and
disburse federal, state, and other funds for the planning, acquisition,
construction, maintenance, operation, and regulation of airports and air
navigation facilities;
(2)  by granting to a state agency the powers and imposing upon it the duties
that the state may obtain the full benefit of financial assistance made
available by the federal government, as well as assistance from other sources;
(3)  by providing authority that may be exercised by a public agency
independently or jointly with other public agencies, and enabling two or more
cities, towns, counties, and other political subdivisions jointly to
establish, acquire, develop, and operate an airport or airports for their
joint or common use.
